Utah statutes.
53A-8-103.   Local school board to establish dismissal procedures.
(1)  A local school board shall, by contract with its employees or their
associations, or by resolution of the board, establish procedures for
dismissal of employees in an orderly manner without discrimination.
(2)  The procedures shall include standards of due process and causes for
dismissal.
